District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.08

Amendment pursuant to reorganization.

(a)

A nonprofit corporation’s articles of incorporation may be amended without action by the board of directors, a designated body, or the members to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under the authority of a law of the United States.

(b)

An individual designated by the court shall deliver to the Mayor for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

(1)

The name of the corporation;

(2)

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

(3)

The date of the court’s order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

(4)

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

(5)

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

(c)

This section shall not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-408.03.